Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 3. ELECTION OFFICERS AND OBSERVERS

CHAPTER 32. ELECTION JUDGES AND CLERKS

SUBCHAPTER A. APPOINTMENT OF ELECTION JUDGES

Sec. 32.001. PRESIDING JUDGE AND ALTERNATE FOR EACH ELECTION PRECINCT. (a) A presiding election judge and an alternate presiding judge shall be appointed for each election precinct in which an election is held.

(b) The alternate presiding judge shall serve as presiding judge for an election if the regularly appointed presiding judge cannot serve.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.002. JUDGES FOR COUNTY ELECTION. (a) The commissioners court shall appoint the election judges for each regular county election precinct:

(1) at its July term in a county with a population of over 500,000; or

(2) at its August term in a county with a population of 500,000 or less.

(b) Judges appointed under Subsection (a) serve for a term of one year, except that the commissioners court by order recorded in its minutes may provide for a term of two years. A judge's term begins:

(1) August 1 following appointment in a county to which Subsection (a)(1) applies; or

(2) September 1 following appointment in a county to which Subsection (a)(2) applies.

(c) The presiding judge and alternate presiding judge must be affiliated or aligned with different political parties, subject to this subsection. Before July of each year in a county to which Subsection (a)(1) applies or before August of each year in a county to which Subsection (a)(2) applies, the county chair of a political party whose candidate for governor received the highest or second highest number of votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election shall submit in writing to the commissioners court a list of names of persons in order of preference for each precinct who are eligible for appointment as an election judge. The county chair may supplement the list of names of persons until the 20th day before a general election or the 15th day before a special election in case an appointed election judge becomes unable to serve. The commissioners court shall appoint the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted in compliance with this subsection by the party with the highest number of votes in the precinct as the presiding judge and the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted in compliance with this subsection by the party with the second highest number of votes in the precinct as the alternate presiding judge. If the candidates for governor of two political parties received the same number of votes in the precinct, the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted by the party whose candidate for governor received the highest number of votes in the county shall be appointed as the presiding judge and the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted by the party whose candidate for governor received the second highest number of votes in the county shall be appointed as the alternate presiding judge. The commissioners court may reject the list if the persons whose names are submitted on the list are determined not to meet the applicable eligibility requirements.

(c-1) For purposes of this subsection, the county chair shall provide a list of names of persons eligible for appointment as election judges. Judges of countywide polling places established under Section 43.007 must be appointed from the list of names of persons submitted by the county chair in compliance with Subsection (c) except that in appointing a person from the list the commissioners court shall apportion the number of judges in direct proportion to the percentage of precincts located in each county commissioners precinct won by each party in the last gubernatorial election, the commissioners court is not required to make the appointments based on specific polling locations or precincts, a presiding judge or alternate presiding judge is not required to serve in a polling place located in the precinct in which the judge resides, and more than one presiding judge or alternate presiding judge may be selected from the same precinct to serve in polling places not located in the precinct in which the judges reside. The county chairs may submit, and the commissioners court may preapprove, the appointment of more presiding judges or alternate presiding judges than necessary to fill available positions. The county clerk may select an individual whose appointment was preapproved by the commissioners court to fill a vacancy in a position that was held by an individual from the same political party. Other than a judge's party affiliation, nothing in this subsection precludes a county clerk from placing an election officer at a countywide polling place based on the need for services at that location.

(d) The county clerk, after making a reasonable effort to consult with the party chair of the appropriate political party or parties, shall submit to the commissioners court a list of names of persons eligible for appointment as presiding judge and alternate presiding judge for each precinct in which an appointment is not made under Subsection (c). The commissioners court shall appoint an eligible person from the list who is affiliated or aligned with the appropriate party, if available.

(e) The commissioners court shall fill a vacancy in the position of presiding judge or alternate presiding judge for the remainder of the unexpired term. An appointment to fill a vacancy may be made at any regular or special term of court. Not later than 48 hours after the county clerk becomes aware of a vacancy, the county clerk shall notify the county chair of the same political party with which the original judge was affiliated or aligned of the vacancy. Not later than the fifth day after the date of notification of the vacancy, the county chair of the same political party with which the original judge was affiliated or aligned shall submit to the commissioners court in writing the name of a person who is eligible for the appointment. If a name is submitted in compliance with this subsection, the commissioners court shall appoint that person to the unexpired term. If a name is not submitted in compliance with this subsection, the county clerk shall submit to the commissioners court a list of names of persons eligible as an appointee for the unexpired term. The commissioners court shall appoint an eligible person from the list who is affiliated or aligned with the same party, if available.

(f) Subject to Section 32.003, the judges appointed under this section shall serve in each election ordered by the governor or a county authority in which the regular county election precincts are required to be used.

(g) Following an oral warning to the election judge and with the concurrence of the county chair of the same political party with which the judge is affiliated or aligned, the county clerk may remove, replace, or reassign an election judge who causes a disruption in a polling location or wilfully disobeys the provisions of this code. A vacancy created under this subsection shall be filled in the same manner as an emergency appointment under Section 32.007.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 8, 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1009, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 89 (S.B. 896), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 351 (H.B. 1145), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 32.003. JUDGES FOR CONSOLIDATED COUNTY ELECTION PRECINCTS. If election precincts are consolidated in a special election in which the regular county election precincts are required to be used, the commissioners court shall appoint the election judges to serve in each consolidated precinct from among the judges appointed for the precincts comprising the consolidated precinct.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.004. JUDGES FOR OTHER ELECTIONS ORDERED BY COUNTY AUTHORITY. Except as otherwise provided by law, for an election ordered by a county authority in which use of the regular county election precincts is not required, the authority ordering the election shall appoint the election judges.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.005. JUDGES FOR ELECTIONS OF OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) The governing body of a political subdivision other than a county shall appoint the election judges for elections ordered by an authority of the political subdivision.

(b) The governing body shall determine whether appointments under Subsection (a) are for a single election or for a definite term not to exceed two years. If appointments are made for a term, the governing body shall set the duration and beginning date of the term and shall fill vacancies in unexpired terms.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.006. JUDGES FOR PRIMARY ELECTIONS. (a) The county chair of a political party holding a primary election shall appoint for each primary the judges for each precinct in which the election will be held in the county and fill any vacancy that occurs in the position of presiding judge or alternate presiding judge.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 32.007. EMERGENCY APPOINTMENT. (a) If neither the presiding judge nor the alternate presiding judge can serve in an election and their inability to serve is discovered after the 20th day before a general election or the 15th day before a special election, the presiding officer of the appointing authority or the authority if a single officer shall appoint a replacement judge to preside at the election, subject to Subsection (f). If the appointing authority is unavailable, the authority responsible for distributing the supplies for the election shall appoint the replacement judge.

(b) If a person authorized to act as presiding judge is not present at the polling place at the time for opening the polls, on receiving information of the absence, the authority authorized to appoint a replacement under Subsection (a) shall investigate the absence and appoint a replacement judge, subject to Subsection (f), unless the authority learns that a previously appointed judge will immediately report for duty.

(c) The appointing authority shall promptly give notice of the emergency appointment to the authority responsible for distributing the supplies for the election. As soon as practicable but not later than the time for closing the polls for the election, the appointing authority shall prepare a written memorandum of the appointment and deliver a signed copy to the presiding officer of the local canvassing authority and to the general custodian of election records. The copies shall be preserved for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

(d) A judge appointed under this section serves only for the election for which the appointment is made.

(e) In this chapter, "emergency appointment" means an appointment made under this section.

(f) A person who is appointed as a replacement for a judge originally appointed under Section 32.002 must be affiliated or aligned with the same political party as was the original judge, if possible, and the appointing authority shall make a reasonable effort to consult with the party chair of the appropriate political party before making an appointment under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 89 (S.B. 896), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 32.008. ORDER OF APPOINTMENT. (a) The appointment of election judges must be made by written order.

(b) The order of appointment need not be recorded in the minutes of the appointing authority.

(c) An order making an appointment for a single election shall be preserved for the period for preserving the precinct election records. An order making an appointment for a term shall be preserved for the longer of:

(1) the term for which the appointment is made; or

(2) the period for preserving precinct election records in the last election in which an appointee serves under the order.

(d) This section does not apply to an emergency appointment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.009. NOTICE OF APPOINTMENT. (a) Each presiding election judge and alternate presiding judge shall be given written notice of the appointment as provided by this section.

(b) The authority responsible for distributing the supplies for the election for which the judge is appointed shall prepare and deliver the notice not later than the 20th day after the date the appointment is made.

(c) The notice must state whether the appointment is for a single election or for a term. If the appointment is for a term, the notice must state the duration and beginning date of the term.

(d) A notice to a presiding judge must state the name, address, and any available telephone number and e-mail address of the alternate, and a notice to an alternate must state the name, address, and any available telephone number and e-mail address of the presiding judge.

(e) If an appointment is for a single election, the notice required by this section and the notice required by Section 4.007 may be combined and given by the authority responsible for giving either of the two notices, as agreed between the two authorities.

(f) This section does not apply to an emergency appointment or to an appointment for a primary election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 32.011. CONFLICTS WITH OTHER LAW. (a) A home-rule city charter supersedes this subchapter to the extent of any conflict.

(b) A law outside this subchapter that prescribes a different appointing authority for election judges supersedes this subchapter with respect to the appointing authority.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.012. PROVISION OF INFORMATION RELATING TO ELECTION JUDGES APPOINTED BY COMMISSIONERS COURT. (a) After the commissioners court appoints a presiding election judge and an alternate presiding judge, the county clerk shall provide to the county chair of each political party a list of the individuals appointed by the commissioners court.

(b) The appointment list must be provided in writing.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. APPOINTMENT OF ELECTION CLERKS

Sec. 32.031. PRESIDING JUDGE TO APPOINT CLERKS. (a) The presiding judge for each election precinct shall appoint the election clerks to assist the judge in the conduct of an election at the polling place served by the judge.

(b) The appointment of an election clerk is for a single election only.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.032. ALTERNATE PRESIDING JUDGE AS CLERK. In an election conducted by the regularly appointed presiding judge, the presiding judge shall appoint the alternate presiding judge as one of the clerks.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.033. NUMBER OF CLERKS. (a) The authority that appoints the election judges shall prescribe the maximum number of clerks that each presiding judge may appoint for each election. The authority may prescribe different maximums for different types of elections.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the presiding judge shall appoint at least two clerks for each precinct in each election and may appoint as many additional clerks, within the prescribed limit, as are necessary for the proper conduct of the election.

(c) In each election ordered by the governor or a county authority in which the regular county election precincts are required to be used, the presiding judge shall appoint clerks for each precinct in the number, within the prescribed limit, the judge considers necessary for the proper conduct of the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 3(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 32.034. CLERKS FOR ELECTIONS FOR FEDERAL, STATE, AND COUNTY OFFICES. (a) The clerks for the general election for state and county officers or for a special election to fill a vacancy in an office regularly filled at the general election shall be selected from different political parties if possible.

(b) The county chair of a political party whose candidate for governor received the highest or second highest number of votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election may, not later than the 25th day before a general election or the 10th day before a special election to which Subsection (a) applies, submit to a presiding judge a list containing the names of at least two persons who are eligible for appointment as a clerk. If a timely list is submitted, the presiding judge shall appoint at least one clerk from the list, except as provided by Subsection (c).

(c) If only one additional clerk is to be appointed for an election in which the alternate presiding judge will serve as a clerk, the clerk shall be appointed from the list of a political party with which neither the presiding judge nor the alternate judge is affiliated or aligned, if such a list is submitted. If two such lists are submitted, the presiding judge shall decide from which list the appointment will be made. If such a list is not submitted, the presiding judge is not required to make an appointment from any list.

(d) The presiding judge shall make an appointment under this section not later than the fifth day after the date the judge receives the list and shall deliver written notification of the appointment to the appropriate county chair.

(e) If a presiding judge has not been appointed at the time the county chair of a political party is required to submit a list of names for the appointment of a clerk under this section, the list of names shall be submitted to the county chair of the political party whose candidate for governor received the most votes in the precinct in the most recent gubernatorial election and to the commissioners court. The county chair, or the commissioners court in a county without a county chair, shall appoint clerks from the list in the same manner provided for a presiding judge to appoint clerks by this section.

(f) Following an oral warning to the election clerk and with the concurrence of the county chair of the same political party with which the election clerk is affiliated or aligned, the county clerk may remove, replace, or reassign an election clerk who causes a disruption in a polling location or wilfully disobeys the provisions of this code. A vacancy created under this subsection shall be filled by the presiding judge, who shall appoint a replacement election clerk who is affiliated or aligned with the same political party as the original clerk, if possible.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 89 (S.B. 896), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 32.035. CONFLICTS WITH CITY CHARTER. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a home-rule city charter supersedes this subchapter to the extent of any conflict.

(b) A home-rule city charter may not provide for fewer than three election officers for each election precinct.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER C. ELIGIBILITY

Sec. 32.051. GENERAL ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), to be eligible to serve as a judge of an election precinct, a person must:

(1) be a qualified voter of the precinct; and

(2) for a regular county election precinct for which an appointment is made by the commissioners court, satisfy any additional eligibility requirements prescribed by written order of the commissioners court.

(b) If the authority making an appointment of a presiding judge or alternate presiding judge cannot find an eligible qualified voter of the precinct who is willing to accept the appointment, the eligibility requirement for a clerk prescribed by Subsection (c) applies.

(c) Except as provided by Section 32.0511, to be eligible to serve as a clerk of an election precinct, a person must be a qualified voter:

(1) of the county, in a countywide election ordered by the governor or a county authority or in a primary election;

(2) of the part of the county in which the election is held, for an election ordered by the governor or a county authority that does not cover the entire county of the person's residence; or

(3) of the political subdivision, in an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235, Sec. 26(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002, Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 517 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 26(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 32.0511. SPECIAL ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS: STUDENT ELECTION CLERKS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Educational institution" means:

(A) a public secondary school; or

(B) an accredited private or parochial secondary school.

(2) "Student" means a person enrolled in an educational institution or a home-schooled student.

(b) A student who is ineligible to serve as a clerk of an election precinct under Section 32.051(c) is eligible to serve as a clerk of an election precinct under this section if the student:

(1) at the time of appointment as an election clerk:

(A) is a student at an educational institution or attends a home school that meets the requirements of Section 25.086(a)(1), Education Code; and

(B) has the consent of:

(i) the principal of the educational institution attended by the student; or

(ii) in the case of a home-schooled student, a parent or legal guardian who is responsible for the student's education; and

(2) at the time of service as an election clerk:

(A) is 16 years of age or older;

(B) is a United States citizen; and

(C) has completed any training course required by the entity holding the election.

(c) A student election clerk serving under this section:

(1) is entitled to compensation under Section 32.091 in the same manner as other election clerks; and

(2) when communicating with a voter who cannot communicate in English, may communicate with the voter in a language the voter and the clerk understand as authorized by Subchapter B, Chapter 61.

(d) Not more than two student election clerks may serve at a polling place, except that not more than four student election clerks may serve at any countywide polling place.

(e) The secretary of state may initiate or assist in the development of a statewide program promoting the use of student election clerks appointed under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 517 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 32.052. INELIGIBILITY OF PUBLIC OFFICER. (a) A person who holds an elective public office is ineligible to serve as an election judge or clerk in an election.

(b) For purposes of this section, a deputy or assistant serving under a public officer does not hold a public office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.053. INELIGIBILITY OF CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE. (a) A person who is a candidate in an election for a contested public or party office is ineligible to serve, in an election to be held on the same day as that election, as an election judge or clerk in any precinct in which the office sought is to be voted on.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) a county clerk; or

(2) a precinct chair declared elected under Section 171.0221.

(c) In this section, "candidate" means a person who has taken affirmative action, as described by the law regulating political funds and campaigns, for the purpose of gaining nomination or election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 167 (H.B. 567), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 32.054. INELIGIBILITY OF EMPLOYEE OR RELATIVE OF CANDIDATE. (a) A person is ineligible to serve as an election judge or clerk in an election if the person is employed by or related within the second degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code, to an opposed candidate for a public office or a party office in any precinct in which the office appears on the ballot. For purposes of this subsection, a candidate whose name appears on the ballot is not considered to be opposed by a write-in candidate other than a declared write-in candidate under Chapter 146.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person is employed by a candidate if:

(1) the candidate is an owner or officer of a business entity by which the person is employed;

(2) the candidate is an officer of a governmental department or agency by which the person is employed; or

(3) the person is under the candidate's supervision in public or private employment.

(c) In this section, "candidate" means a person who has taken affirmative action, as described by the law regulating political funds and campaigns, for the purpose of gaining nomination or election.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), a person employed by a county solely as an early voting clerk appointed under Chapter 83 is not employed by a candidate for purposes of this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 15, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 984 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 32.055. INELIGIBILITY OF CAMPAIGN TREASURER. (a) A person is ineligible to serve as an election judge or clerk in an election if the person is the campaign treasurer of a candidate in that election.

(b) In this section, "candidate" means a person who has taken affirmative action, as described by the law regulating political funds and campaigns, for the purpose of gaining nomination or election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.03, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 32.0551. INELIGIBILITY OF CAMPAIGN MANAGER. (a) A person is ineligible to serve as an election judge or clerk in an election if the person is a campaign manager of a candidate in that election.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Campaign manager" means:

(A) the person who directs, with or without compensation, the day-to-day operations of a candidate's election campaign; or

(B) each person who directs, with or without compensation, a substantial portion of the day-to-day operations of a candidate's election campaign if no single person performs that function.

(2) "Candidate" means a person who has taken affirmative action, as described by the law regulating political funds and campaigns, for the purpose of gaining nomination or election.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 32.0552. INELIGIBILITY OF PERSON CONVICTED OF ELECTION OFFENSE. A person is ineligible to serve as an election judge or clerk in an election if the person has been finally convicted of an offense in connection with conduct directly attributable to an election.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 32.056. CITY CHARTER REQUIREMENTS. Eligibility requirements or grounds of ineligibility in addition to those prescribed by this subchapter may be prescribed by a home-rule city charter for election officers serving in elections ordered by an authority of the city.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 32.071. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITY OF PRESIDING JUDGE. The presiding judge is in charge of and responsible for the management and conduct of the election at the polling place of the election precinct that the judge serves.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 32.072. DUTIES AND WORKING HOURS OF CLERKS. (a) The presiding judge shall designate the working hours of and assign the duties to be performed by the election clerks serving under the judge.

(b) Subject to Section 32.073, clerks may be assigned to work for different lengths of time and to begin work at different hours.

(c) With respect to designating the working hours of and assigning the duties to be performed by the election clerks, the presiding judge, to facilitate and protect the integrity of the voting process, shall treat all election clerks serving at the polling place uniformly.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 89 (S.B. 896), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 32.073. ABSENCE OF ELECTION OFFICERS FROM POLLING PLACE. (a) The presiding judge and the clerks who are on duty at the time of any manual count or examination of ballots before the time for closing the polls shall remain on duty without leaving the polling place while the polls are open. Clerks may be assigned to work for periods ending before any manual count or examination of ballots begins. The presiding judge may permit temporary absences for meals or other necessary activities.

(b) If the presiding judge does not permit the clerks to be absent for meals, the judge must permit meals to be brought or delivered to the polling place.

(c) With respect to regulating temporary absences from the polling place while the polls are open, the presiding judge shall treat all election officers serving at the polling place uniformly.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 32.074. ADMINISTRATION OF OATHS. An election judge or clerk may administer any oath required or authorized to be made at a polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.075. LAW ENFORCEMENT DUTIES AND POWERS. (a) The presiding judge shall preserve order and prevent breaches of the peace and violations of this code in the polling place and in the area within which electioneering and loitering are prohibited from the time the judge arrives at the polling place on election day until the judge leaves the polling place after the polls close.

(b) In performing duties under Subsection (a), the presiding judge may appoint one or more persons to act as special peace officers for the polling place. A special peace officer may not enforce the prohibition against electioneering or loitering near the polling place unless the officer's appointment is approved by the presiding officer of the local canvassing authority.

(c) In performing duties under Subsection (a), a presiding judge has the power of a district judge to enforce order and preserve the peace, including the power to issue an arrest warrant. An appeal of an order or other action of the presiding judge under this section is made in the same manner as the appeal of an order or other action of a district court in the county in which the polling place is located.

(d) A person who is arrested at a polling place while voting or waiting to vote shall be permitted to vote, if entitled to do so, before being removed from the polling place.

(e) The presiding judge or a special peace officer appointed under this section may not enforce the prohibition against electioneering or loitering outside of the area within which electioneering and loitering are prohibited under Section 61.003 or 85.036.

(f) A person is eligible for appointment as a special peace officer under Subsection (b) only if the person is licensed as a peace officer by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(g) A presiding judge may not have a watcher duly accepted for service under Subchapter A, Chapter 33, removed from the polling place for violating a provision of this code or any other provision of law relating to the conduct of elections, other than a violation of the Penal Code, unless the violation was observed by an election judge or clerk.

(h) Notwithstanding Subsection (g), a presiding judge may call a law enforcement officer to request that a poll watcher be removed if the poll watcher commits a breach of the peace or a violation of law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1094, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 918 (H.B. 3143), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 504 (H.B. 1503), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.17, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 4.01, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 32.076. DISCLOSURE OF E-MAIL ADDRESS AND PHONE NUMBER RESTRICTED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an e-mail address or personal phone number of an election judge or clerk collected or maintained by the authority conducting the election is confidential and does not constitute public information for purposes of Chapter 552, Government Code.

(b) An e-mail address or phone number described by Subsection (a) shall be made available on request to:

(1) any entity eligible to submit lists of election judges or clerks for that election; or

(2) the state executive committee of a political party with a county chair eligible to submit lists of election judges or clerks for that election.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1062 (H.B. 2160), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. COMPENSATION

Sec. 32.091. COMPENSATION FOR SERVICES AT POLLING PLACE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an election judge or clerk is entitled to compensation for services rendered at a precinct polling place at an hourly rate not to exceed the amount fixed by the appropriate authority, which amount must be at least the federal minimum hourly wage. A judge or clerk may be compensated at that rate for services rendered under Section 62.014(c).

(b) A judge or clerk may not be paid for more than two hours of work before the polls open, except for payment made for work under Section 62.014(c). In a precinct in which voting machines are used, a judge or clerk may not be paid for more than two hours of work after the time for closing the polls or after the last voter has voted, whichever is later.

(c) For a primary or runoff primary election, the minimum hourly rate is the greater of the maximum rate provided by Subsection (a) or, if the election officer attended a training program as provided by Subchapter F, $7.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 21 (S.B. 1052), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 32.092. COMPENSATION FOR DELIVERING ELECTION RECORDS AND SUPPLIES. (a) The election judge or clerk who delivers the precinct election records, keys to ballot boxes or other election equipment, and unused election supplies after an election is entitled to compensation for that service in an amount not to exceed $25.

(b) If more than one election officer delivers the records, keys, and unused supplies, the presiding judge shall determine how the amount fixed for the service is to be allocated among the officers.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.093. AUTHORITY FIXING COMPENSATION. The compensation of election judges and clerks shall be fixed by the following authority:

(1) for an election ordered by the governor or a county authority, the commissioners court;

(2) for an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county, the political subdivision's governing body; and

(3) for a primary election, the county executive committee of the political party holding the primary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 32.094. STATEMENT OF COMPENSATION. (a) After each election, each presiding judge serving in the election shall prepare and sign, in duplicate, a statement containing the following information:

(1) the name and address of the presiding judge and each clerk who served under the judge;

(2) the number of hours that each election officer worked at the polling place or at another location under Section 62.014(c), excluding time for which payment may not be made; and

(3) the name of the election officer who delivered the election records, keys, and unused supplies, and, if more than one officer, the name of and the amount of compensation allocated to each officer.

(b) In addition to the information required by Subsection (a), the compensation statement must include the total hourly compensation earned by each officer if the authority responsible for distributing the election supplies directs the presiding judge to include that information.

(c) The presiding judge shall follow the instructions of the authority responsible for distributing the election supplies with respect to:

(1) the time by which and the authority to whom the presiding judge is to deliver the compensation statement; and

(2) any other instructions that the authority considers appropriate to ensure that the election officers are paid.

(d) The time designated under Subsection (c)(1) for delivery of the compensation statement may not be later than 5 p.m. of the third day after election day.

(e) The original compensation statement shall be used for making payment for the services. The general custodian of election records shall preserve the duplicate for the period for preserving the precinct election records. If the presiding judge delivers the statement to an authority other than the general custodian of election records, the authority receiving the statement shall deliver the duplicate to the general custodian not later than the third day after the date of its receipt.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER F. TRAINING

Sec. 32.111. TRAINING STANDARDS FOR ELECTION JUDGES. (a) The secretary of state shall:

(1) adopt standards of training in election law and procedure for presiding or alternate election judges;

(2) develop materials for a standardized curriculum for that training, including a published handbook, made available on the secretary of state's Internet website, free of charge; and

(3) distribute the materials as necessary to the governing bodies of political subdivisions that hold elections and to each county executive committee of a political party that holds a primary election.

(b) The training standards may include required attendance at appropriate training programs or the passage of an examination at the end of a training program.

(c) The training standards adopted under Subsection (a) must include provisions on the acceptance and handling of the identification presented by a voter to an election officer under Section 63.001.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 415 (H.B. 1632), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 32.1111. ONLINE TRAINING. (a) The secretary of state shall:

(1) make available a standardized training program developed under Section 32.111:

(A) entirely via the Internet; and

(B) at any time, without a requirement for prior registration;

(2) require the passage of an examination at the end of the training program; and

(3) provide an individual who completes the training with a certificate of completion.

(b) A certificate of completion provided under Subsection (a)(3) shall expire no later than one year following the date it was awarded.

(c) Completion of the training program under this section is not a prerequisite to eligibility for service in an election for:

(1) county election officials;

(2) presiding or alternate election judges;

(3) election clerks;

(4) members of the early voting ballot board;

(5) members of the signature verification committee; or

(6) central counting station officers.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 415 (H.B. 1632), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 32.112. EXPENSE OF TRAINING JUDGES. The governing body of a political subdivision may appropriate funds to:

(1) compensate its election judges, early voting clerk, and deputy early voting clerks in charge of early voting polling places for attending a training program required under Section 32.111, at an hourly rate not to exceed the maximum rate of compensation of an election judge for services rendered at a precinct polling place or, if applicable, for attending a training program under Section 32.114; and

(2) pay the expenses of conducting the programs.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.37; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 32.113. TRAINING PROGRAMS. (a) The governing body of a political subdivision other than a county may, and the county executive committee of a political party shall, provide training for its election officers using the standardized training program and materials developed and provided by the secretary of state under Section 32.111.

(b) A political subdivision or county executive committee may conduct its training independently or jointly with other entities.

(c) A law outside this code providing for a training program in connection with a specified type of election supersedes this subchapter to the extent of any conflict.

(d) The governing body of the political subdivision shall notify the voter registrar of each county in which the political subdivision is situated of the date, hour, and place of each session of the training program.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 32.114. PUBLIC COUNTY TRAINING PROGRAM. (a) The county clerk shall provide one or more sessions of training using the standardized training program and materials developed and provided by the secretary of state under Section 32.111 for the election judges and clerks appointed to serve in elections ordered by the governor or a county authority. Each election judge shall complete the training program. The training program must include specific procedures related to the early voting ballot board and the central counting station, as applicable. Each election clerk shall complete the part of the training program relating to the acceptance and handling of the identification presented by a voter to an election officer under Section 63.001.

(b) A training program provided under this section is open to the public free of charge.

(c) The county clerk shall:

(1) post a notice of the time and place of each session on the county's Internet website, if the county maintains an Internet website, and may post the notice on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court and shall include on the notice a statement that the program is open to the public;

(1-a) post notice of the time and place of each session on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court, if the county does not maintain an Internet website, and shall include on the notice a statement that the program is open to the public;

(2) notify each presiding judge appointed by the commissioners court of the time and place of each session and of the duty of each election judge to complete the training program;

(3) notify the county chair of each political party in the county of the time and place of each session; and

(4) notify the voter registrar of the date, hour, and place of each session.

(d) Each presiding judge receiving notice under Subsection (c)(2) shall notify the alternate presiding judge and other persons who serve as clerks for the judge's precinct of the time and place of each session.

(e) An election judge, early voting clerk, or deputy early voting clerk in charge of an early voting polling place is entitled to compensation for attending the training program at an hourly rate fixed by the appropriate authority in an amount that is equal to or greater than the federal minimum wage.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 32.115. SECRETARY OF STATE TO ASSIST IN TRAINING. On request of a county executive committee or a county clerk, as appropriate, the secretary of state shall schedule and provide assistance for the training of election judges and clerks under Section 32.113 or 32.114. The secretary may provide similar training assistance to other political subdivisions.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.